incubator/apertium-hi.hi_WX.dix
      <e><p><l>UzgI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eMgI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ogI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eMgI</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="so/__v">
      <e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>I</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yIM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kara</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Uz</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ne</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nIM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>we</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wIM</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UzgA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeMge</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oge</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeMge</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UzgI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yegI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yegI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeMgI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ogI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyegA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yeMgI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/E__v">
      <e><p><l>Uz</l><r>E<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>E</l><r>E<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>E</l><r>E<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>EM</l><r>E<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>E<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>EM</l><r>E<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Bigo"><i>Bigo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bilo"><i>bilo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="bo"><i>bo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="Do"><i>Do</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="hE"><i>h</i><par n="h/E__v"/></e>
    <e lm="Ko"><i>Ko</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="piro"><i>piro</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="ro"><i>ro</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="saMjo"><i>saMjo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="sazjo"><i>sazjo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
    <e lm="Xo"><i>Xo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
